Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 6. Procedures for Public Influence.

Editor’s notes. —

Chapter 129, SLA 1980, amended various local option provisions of former AS 04.
However, the subsequent enactment of the major revision of AS 04 by ch. 131, SLA 1980, repealed the earlier local option provisions of AS 04 and all amendments to them.

Sec. 04.11.470.
Objection.

A person may object to an application for issuance, renewal, transfer of location, or transfer to another person of a license, or for issuance of a permit, by serving upon the applicant and the board the reasons for the objection.
The board shall consider the objections and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

when it considers the application.
An objection and the record of a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

shall be retained as part of the board’s permanent record of its review of the application.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 123, 124, 139.

Sec. 04.11.470.
Objection.

A person may object to an application for issuance, renewal, transfer of location, or transfer to another person of a license, for issuance, renewal, or transfer to another person of a license with one or more endorsements, for issuance of an endorsement, or for issuance of a permit by serving upon the applicant and the board the reasons for the objection. The board shall consider the objections and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

when it considers the application. An objection and the record of a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

shall be retained as part of the board’s permanent record of its review of the application.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 64 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.480.
Protest.

A local governing body may protest the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer to another person of a license by sending the board and the applicant a protest and the reasons for the protest within 60 days of receipt from the board of notice of filing of the application. A protest received after the 60-day period may not be accepted by the board, and in no event may a protest cause the board to reconsider an approved renewal, relocation, or transfer. The local governing body may protest the continued operation of a license during the second year of the biennial license period by sending the board and the licensee a protest and the reasons for the protest by January 31 of the second year of the license. The procedures for action on a protest of continued operation of a license are the same as the procedures for action on a protest of a renewal application. The board shall consider a protest and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) when it considers the application or continued operation, and the protest and the record of the hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) shall be kept as part of the board’s permanent record of its review. If an application or continued operation is protested, the board shall deny the application or continued operation unless the board finds that the protest is arbitrary, capricious, and unreasonable.

If the permanent residents residing outside of but within two miles of an incorporated city or an established village wish to protest the issuance, renewal, or transfer of a license within the city or village, they shall file with the board a petition meeting the requirements of AS

04.11.510(b)(3)

requesting a public hearing within 30 days of the posting of notice required under AS

04.11.310

, or by December 31 of the year application is made for renewal of a license. The board shall consider testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(3)

when it considers the application, and the record of a hearing conducted under AS 04.11.510(b)(3) shall be retained as part of the board’s permanent record of its review of the application.

A local governing body may recommend that a license be issued, renewed, relocated, or transferred with conditions. The board shall consider recommended conditions and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) when it considers the application or continued operation, and the recommended conditions and the record of the hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) shall be kept as part of the board’s permanent record of its review. If the local governing body recommends conditions, the board shall impose the recommended conditions unless the board finds that the recommended conditions are arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable. If a condition recommended by a local governing body is imposed on a licensee, the local governing body shall assume responsibility for monitoring compliance with the condition, except as otherwise provided by the board.

In addition to the right to protest under (a) of this section, a local governing body may notify the board that the local governing body has determined that a licensee has violated a provision of this title or a condition imposed on the licensee by the board. Unless the board finds that the local governing body’s determination is arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, the board shall prepare the determination as an accusation against the licensee under AS

44.62.360

and conduct proceedings to resolve the matter as described under AS

04.11.510(c)

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 14 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.480.
Protest.

A local governing body may protest the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer to another person of a license, issuance, renewal, or transfer to another person of a license with one or more endorsements, or issuance of an endorsement by sending the board and the applicant a protest and the reasons for the protest within 60 days of the date of the notice of filing of the application. A protest received after the 60-day period may not be accepted by the board, and in no event may a protest cause the board to reconsider an approved renewal, relocation, or transfer. The local governing body may protest the continued operation of a license or endorsement during the second year of the biennial license period by sending the board and the licensee a protest and the reasons for the protest by January 31 of the second year of the license. The procedures for action on a protest of continued operation of a license or endorsement are the same as the procedures for action on a protest of a renewal application. The board shall consider a protest and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) when it considers the application or continued operation, and the protest and the record of the hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) shall be kept as part of the board’s permanent record of its review. If an application or continued operation is protested, the board shall deny the application or continued operation unless the board finds that the protest is arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable.

If the permanent residents residing outside of but within two miles of an incorporated city or an established village wish to protest the issuance, renewal, or transfer of a license or a license with one or more endorsements within the city or village, they shall file with the board a petition meeting the requirements of AS

04.11.510(b)(3)

requesting a public hearing not later than 30 days after the posting of notice required under AS

04.11.310

, or by December 31 of the year application is made for renewal of a license. The board shall consider testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(3)

when it considers the application, and the record of a hearing conducted under AS 04.11.510(b)(3) shall be retained as part of the board’s permanent record of its review of the application.

A local governing body may recommend that a license be issued, renewed, relocated, or transferred, or that a license with one or more endorsements be issued, renewed, or transferred to another person, with conditions. The board shall consider recommended conditions and testimony received at a hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) when it considers the application or continued operation, and the recommended conditions and the record of the hearing conducted under AS

04.11.510(b)(2)

or (4) shall be kept as part of the board’s permanent record of its review. If the local governing body recommends conditions, the board shall impose the recommended conditions unless the board finds that the recommended conditions are arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable. If a condition recommended by a local governing body is imposed on a licensee, the local governing body shall assume responsibility for monitoring compliance with the condition, except as otherwise provided by the board.

In addition to the right to protest under (a) of this section, a local governing body may notify the board that the local governing body has determined that a licensee has violated a provision of this title or a condition imposed on the licensee by the board. Unless the board finds that the local governing body’s determination is arbitrary, capricious, or unreasonable, the board shall prepare the determination as an accusation against the licensee under AS

44.62.360

and conduct proceedings to resolve the matter as described under AS

04.11.510(c)

.

If the location or proposed location of a license is within the boundaries of more than one local government, each local governing body may protest the issuance, renewal, relocation, or transfer of a license.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 1981; am § 20 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 14 ch 74 SLA 1999; am §§ 65 — 68 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.490.
Prohibition of the sale of alcoholic beverages. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.491.
Local options.

If a majority of the persons voting on the question vote to approve the option, a municipality shall adopt a local option to prohibit

the sale of alcoholic beverages;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except by one or more of the following listed on the ballot:

a restaurant or eating place licensee;

a beverage dispensary licensee;

a package store licensee;

a caterer holding a permit under AS

04.11.230

to sell alcoholic beverages at a site within the municipality who is also licensed under a beverage dispensary license for premises outside of the municipality;

a winery licensee;

a winery licensee, except that sales may occur only to a person licensed under this title or in another state or country; or

an outdoor recreation lodge licensee;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except on premises operated by the municipality and under a type of licensed premises listed on the ballot, that may include one or more of the following:

a restaurant or eating place license;

a beverage dispensary license; or

a package store license;

the sale and importation of alcoholic beverages; or

the sale, importation, and possession of alcoholic beverages.

If a majority of the persons voting on the question vote to approve the option, an established village shall exercise a local option to prohibit

the sale of alcoholic beverages;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except by one or more of the following listed on the ballot:

a restaurant or eating place licensee;

a beverage dispensary licensee;

a package store licensee;

a caterer holding a permit under AS

04.11.230

to sell alcoholic beverages at a site within the established village who is also licensed under a beverage dispensary license for premises outside of the established village;

a winery licensee;

a winery licensee, except that sales may occur only to a person licensed under this title or in another state or country; or

an outdoor recreation lodge licensee;

the sale and importation of alcoholic beverages; or

the sale, importation, and possession of alcoholic beverages.

A ballot question to adopt a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to: “Shall (name of municipality or village) adopt a local option to prohibit (local option under (a) or (b) of this section)? (yes or no).”

The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(A), (a)(3)(A), or (b)(2)(A) of this section must include a summary explanation of the authority to sell alcoholic beverages given to a restaurant or eating place under AS

04.11.100(a)

. The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(B) or (D), (a)(3)(B), or (b)(2)(B) or (D) of this section must include a statement that a beverage dispensary license is commonly known as a “bar” and a summary explanation of the authority to sell alcoholic beverages given to a beverage dispensary licensee under AS

04.11.090(a)

. The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(C), (a)(3)(C), or (b)(2)(C) of this section must include a statement that a package store license is commonly known as a “liquor store” and a summary explanation of the authority to sell alcoholic beverages given to a package store licensee under AS

04.11.150(a)

.

If a municipality dissolves under AS

29.06.450(a)

or (b), a local option adopted by the municipality under (a) of this section shall continue in effect as the corresponding local option under (b) of this section for an established village having the same perimeter as the previous boundaries of the municipality. A license for premises operated by the municipality under AS

04.11.505

expires when the municipality dissolves.

A municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under (a)(1), (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) of this section may designate a site for the delivery of alcoholic beverages to individuals in the area or a site for a person to bring alcoholic beverages if the alcoholic beverages are imported into the area. This subsection does not apply to the delivery or importation of

one liter or less of distilled spirits, two liters or less of wine, or one gallon or less of malt beverages; or

alcoholic beverages to a premises licensed under (a)(2) — (3) or (b)(2) of this section.

If a municipality or established village has adopted a local option under (a)(1), (2), (3), or (4), or (b)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the municipality or established village, as part of the local option question or questions placed before the voters, may

adopt an amount of alcoholic beverages that may be imported that is less than the amounts set out in AS

04.11.150(g)

;

adopt an amount of alcoholic beverages that would give rise to a presumption that the person possessed the alcoholic beverages for sale; the amounts adopted under this paragraph may be lower than those set out in AS

04.11.010(c)

;

opt to not apply a class C felony to violations of AS

04.16.051

that apply solely by reason of the municipality or established village adopting a local option under this section.

History.

(§ 21 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 121 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 8, 9 ch 59 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2018 amendments to this section, see sec. 12(b), ch. 59, SLA 2018 in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective October 11, 2018, added (a)(2)(G) and (b)(2)(G), and made related changes.

Sec. 04.11.491.
Local options.

If a majority of the persons voting on the question vote to approve the option, a municipality shall adopt a local option to prohibit

the sale of alcoholic beverages;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except by one or more of the following listed on the ballot:

a restaurant or eating place licensee;

a beverage dispensary licensee;

a package store licensee;

a caterer holding a beverage dispensary caterer’s permit under AS

04.09.610

to sell alcoholic beverages at a site within the municipality who is also licensed under a beverage dispensary license for premises outside of the municipality;

a winery manufacturer licensee;

a winery manufacturer licensee, except that sales may occur only to a person licensed under this title or in another state or country;

an outdoor recreation lodge licensee; or

a package store licensee limited to selling only beer and wine;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except on premises operated by the municipality and under a type of licensed premises listed on the ballot, that may include one or more of the following:

a restaurant or eating place license;

a beverage dispensary license; or

a package store license;

the sale and importation of alcoholic beverages; or

the sale, importation, and possession of alcoholic beverages.

If a majority of the persons voting on the question vote to approve the option, an established village shall exercise a local option to prohibit

the sale of alcoholic beverages;

the sale of alcoholic beverages except by one or more of the following listed on the ballot:

a restaurant or eating place licensee;

a beverage dispensary licensee;

a package store licensee;

a caterer holding a beverage dispensary caterer’s permit under AS

04.09.610

to sell alcoholic beverages at a site within the established village who is also licensed under a beverage dispensary license for premises outside of the established village;

a winery manufacturer licensee;

a winery manufacturer licensee, except that sales may occur only to a person licensed under this title or in another state or country;

an outdoor recreation lodge licensee; or

a package store licensee limited to selling only beer and wine;

the sale and importation of alcoholic beverages; or

the sale, importation, and possession of alcoholic beverages.

A ballot question to adopt a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to: “Shall (name of municipality or village) adopt a local option to prohibit (local option under (a) or (b) of this section)? (yes or no).”

The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(A), (a)(3)(A), or (b)(2)(A) of this section must include a summary explanation of the authority to sell alcoholic beverages given to a restaurant or eating place under AS

04.09.210(a)

. The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(B) or (D), (a)(3)(B), or (b)(2)(B) or (D) of this section must include a statement that a beverage dispensary license is commonly known as a “bar” and a summary explanation of the authority to sell alcoholic beverages given to a beverage dispensary licensee under AS

04.09.200

. The ballot for an election on the option set out in (a)(2)(C), (a)(3)(C), or (b)(2)(C) of this section must include a statement that a package store license is commonly known as a “liquor store” and a summary

If a municipality dissolves under AS

29.06.450(a)

or (b), a local option adopted by the municipality under (a) of this section shall continue in effect as the corresponding local option under (b) of this section for an established village having the same perimeter as the previous boundaries of the municipality. A license for premises operated by the municipality under AS

04.11.505

expires when the municipality dissolves.

A municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under (a)(1), (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2) of this section may designate a site for the delivery of alcoholic beverages to individuals in the area or a site for a person to bring alcoholic beverages if the alcoholic beverages are imported into the area. This subsection does not apply to the delivery or importation of

one liter or less of distilled spirits, two liters or less of wine, or one gallon or less of malt beverages; or

alcoholic beverages to a premises licensed under (a)(2) — (3) or (b)(2) of this section.

If a municipality or established village has adopted a local option under (a)(1), (2), (3), or (4), or (b)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, the municipality or established village, as part of the local option question or questions placed before the voters, may

adopt an amount of alcoholic beverages that may be imported that is less than the amounts set out in AS

04.09.460(e)

;

adopt an amount of alcoholic beverages that would give rise to a presumption that the person possessed the alcoholic beverages for sale; the amounts adopted under this paragraph may be lower than those set out in AS

04.11.010(c)

;

opt to not apply a class C felony to violations of AS

04.16.051

that apply solely by reason of the municipality or established village adopting a local option under this section.

History.

(§ 21 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 121 SLA 1998; am § 3 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 4 ch 124 SLA 2004; am §§ 8, 9 ch 59 SLA 2018; am §§ 69 — 72 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.492.
Community liquor license; complete prohibition on sales. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.493.
Change of local option.

If a majority of persons voting on the question vote to approve a different local option, a municipality or established village shall change a local option previously adopted under AS

04.11.491

to the different approved option.

A ballot question to change a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to: “Shall (name of municipality or village) change the local option currently in effect, that prohibits (current local option under AS

04.11.491

), and adopt in its place a local option to prohibit (proposed local option under AS

04.11.491

)? (yes or no).”

History.

(§ 22 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.11.494.
Operation of delivery sites. [Repealed, § 15 ch 63 SLA 2001 as amended by § 1 ch 28 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 04.11.495.
Removal of local option.

If a majority of the persons voting on the question vote to remove the option, a municipality or established village shall remove a local option previously adopted under AS

04.11.491

. The option is repealed effective the first day of the month following certification of the results of the election.

A ballot question to remove a local option under this section must at least contain language substantially similar to: “Shall (name of municipality or village) remove the local option currently in effect, that prohibits (current local option under AS

04.11.491

), so that there is no longer any local option in effect? (yes or no).”

When issuing a license in the area that has removed a local option, the board shall give priority to an applicant who was formerly licensed and whose license was not renewed because of the results of the previous local option election. However, an applicant described in this subsection does not have a legal right to a license and the board is not required to approve the application.

History.

(§ 22 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.11.496.
Prohibition of sale and importation of alcoholic beverages. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.497.
Effect on licenses of prohibition of sale.

If a majority of voters vote to prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (a)(4) or (5), (b)(1), or (b)(3) or (4), the board may not issue, renew, or transfer, between persons or locations, a license for premises located within the boundaries of the municipality and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality or within the perimeter of the established village. A license that may not be renewed because of a local option election held under this section is void 90 days after the results of the election are certified. A license that expires during the 90 days after the results of a local option election are certified may be extended, until it is void under this section, by payment of a prorated portion of the biennial license fee.

History.

(§ 23 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.11.498.
Prohibition of possession of alcoholic beverages. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.499.
Prohibition of importation or purchase after election.

If a majority of the voters vote to prohibit the importation of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(4)

or (5) or (b)(3) or (4), a person, beginning on the first day of the month following certification of the results of the election, may not knowingly send, transport, or bring an alcoholic beverage into the municipality or established village, unless the alcoholic beverage is sacramental wine to be used for bona fide religious purposes based on tenets or teachings of a church or religious body, is limited in quantity to the amount necessary for religious purposes, and is dispensed only for religious purposes by a person authorized by the church or religious body to dispense the sacramental wine.

A person who resides in a municipality or established village that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)

or (b) may not purchase alcohol from another person who has sent, transported, or brought an alcoholic beverage into the municipality or established village in violation of the local option.

In this section,

“bring” means to carry or convey or to attempt or solicit to carry or convey;

“send” means to cause to be taken or distributed or to attempt or solicit to cause to be taken or distributed, and includes use of the United States Postal Service;

“transport” means to ship by any method, and includes delivering or transferring or attempting or soliciting to deliver or transfer an alcoholic beverage to be shipped to, delivered to, or left or held for pickup by any person.

History.

(§ 24 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 6 ch 63 SLA 2001; am § 1 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 8, 9 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Cross references. —

For penalties for a violation of this section, see
AS

04.16.200

.

Sec. 04.11.500.
Prohibition of the sale of alcoholic beverages except by selected licenses. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.501.
Prohibition of possession after election.

If a majority of the voters vote to prohibit the possession of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

or (b)(4), a person may not knowingly possess an alcoholic beverage in the municipality or established village, unless the alcoholic beverage is sacramental wine to be used for bona fide religious purposes based on tenets or teachings of a church or religious body, is limited in quantity to the amount necessary for religious purposes, and is dispensed only for religious purposes, by a person recognized by the church or religious body as authorized to dispense the wine.

If there are licensed premises within the municipality or established village, the prohibition on possession is effective beginning 90 days after the results of the election are certified. If there are no licensed premises within the municipality or established village, the prohibition on possession is effective beginning 60 days after the results of the election are certified.

Upon the adoption by a municipality of a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

, an ordinance is adopted containing the provisions of this section.

In this section, “possession” means having physical possession of or exercising dominion or control over an alcoholic beverage, but does not include having an alcoholic beverage within the digestive system of a person.

History.

(§ 25 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For penalties for a violation of this section, see AS

04.16.205

.

Sec. 04.11.502.
Procedure for local option elections. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.503.
Effect on licenses of restriction on sale.

If a majority of the voters vote under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)

or (b)(2) to prohibit sale of alcoholic beverages except by the type or types of licensees or permit holders listed on the ballot, the board may not issue, renew, or transfer between persons or locations a license for premises located within the boundaries of the municipality and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality or within the perimeter of the established village, except the type or types of licenses listed on the ballot. A license in effect within the boundaries of the municipality or perimeter of the established village, and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality, except the type of license listed on the ballot, is void 90 days after the results of the election are certified. A license that expires during the 90 days after the results of a local option election are certified may be extended, until it is void under this section, by payment of a prorated portion of the biennial license fee.

History.

(§ 26 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Sec. 04.11.504.
Reinstatement of licenses. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.505.
Licensing after prohibition on sale except in premises operated by municipality.

If a majority of the voters vote under AS

04.11.491(a)(3)

to prohibit the sale of alcoholic beverages except on premises operated by the municipality, the board may not issue, renew, or transfer between persons or locations a license for premises located within the boundaries of a municipality and in unincorporated areas within five miles of the boundaries of the municipality, with the exception of the type of license listed on the ballot and operated under a license held by the municipality. A license in effect is void 90 days after the results of the election are certified. A license that expires during the 90 days after the results of a local option election are certified may be extended, until it is void under this subsection, by payment of a prorated portion of the biennial license fee.

The local governing body of a municipality shall apply for a license to operate the type of licensed premises listed on the ballot under AS

04.11.491(a)(3)

and approved by a majority of the voters. The municipality shall operate the premises subject to the conditions and fees applicable to the type of license. Nothing in this section precludes a municipality from applying to be a licensee under other provisions of this title.

History.

(§ 27 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Cross references. —

For provisions continuing community liquor licenses issued under former 04.11.190, see § 72, ch. 101, SLA 1995 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 04.11.506.
Notice of the results of a local option election. [Repealed, § 69 ch 101 SLA 1995.]

Sec. 04.11.507.
Procedure for local option elections.

Elections to adopt a local option under AS

04.11.491

, change a local option under AS

04.11.493

, or remove a local option under AS

04.11.495

, shall be conducted as required in this section.

Upon receipt of a petition of a number of registered voters equal to 35 percent or more of the number of votes cast at the last regular municipal election, the local governing body of a municipality shall place upon a separate ballot at the next regular election, or at a special election, whichever local option, change in local option, or removal of local option constitutes the subject of the petition. The local governing body shall conduct the election under the election ordinance of the municipality.

Upon receipt of a petition of 35 percent or more of the registered voters residing within an established village, the lieutenant governor shall place upon a separate ballot at a special election the local option, change in local option, or removal of local option that constitutes the subject of the petition. The lieutenant governor shall conduct the election under AS 15.

A petition filed with the local governing body of a municipality under (b) of this section, that places on the ballot the option set out in AS

04.11.491(a)(5)

, constitutes a proposed ordinance of the municipality.

AS

29.26.110

—

29.26.160

apply to a petition under (b) of this section in a general law municipality except the

number of required signatures is determined under (b) of this section rather than under AS

29.26.130

;

application filed under AS

29.26.110

must at least contain language substantially similar to the questions set out under AS

04.11.491

—

04.11.495

rather than containing an ordinance or resolution;

petition must at least contain language substantially similar to the questions set out under AS

04.11.491

—

04.11.495

rather than material required under AS

29.26.120(a)(1)

and (2).

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an election under (b) or (c) of this section to remove a local option or to change to a less restrictive option than the local option previously adopted under AS

04.11.491

may not be conducted during the first 24 months after the local option was adopted or more than once in a 36-month period.

Notwithstanding AS

29.26.140(a)

, after a petition has been certified as sufficient to meet the requirements of (b) or (c) of this section, another petition may not be filed or certified until after the question presented in the first petition has been voted on. Only one local option question may be presented in an election.

History.

(§ 28 ch 101 SLA 1995; am § 10 ch 25 SLA 2007)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 04.11.508.
Establishment of perimeter of established village.

Except as provided under (b) and (c) of this section, for purposes of AS

04.11.491

,

04.11.497

, and

04.11.503

, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of the post office of the established village. If the established village does not have a post office, the perimeter of an established village is a circle around the established village that includes an area within a five-mile radius of another site selected by the local governing body or by the board if the established village does not have a local governing body.

If the perimeter of an established village determined under (a) of this section includes any area that is

within a municipality

that has adopted a local option, the local option adopted by the municipality applies in the overlapping area;

the local option adopted by the established village does not apply in the overlapping area;

within the perimeter of another established village and, if the other established village has

also adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

, the local option of the established village that is less restrictive applies in the overlapping area;

not adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

, the local option does not apply in the overlapping area.

If the board determines that the perimeter of an established village as provided under (a) and (b) of this section does not accurately reflect the perimeter of the established village, the board may establish the perimeter of the established village and the areas of overlapping perimeter described under (b) of this section for purposes of applying a local option selected under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 86 SLA 1997; am §§ 5, 6 ch 124 SLA 2004)

Sec. 04.11.509.
Notice of the results of a local option election.

If a majority of the voters vote to prohibit, change, or remove a local option under AS

04.11.491

—

04.11.495

, the clerk of the municipality, or, if the election is in an established village, the lieutenant governor shall notify the board of the results of the election immediately after the results are certified. The board shall immediately notify the Department of Law and the Department of Public Safety of the results of the election.

If a majority of the voters vote to prohibit the importation or possession of alcoholic beverages under AS

04.11.491(a)(4)

or (5) or (b)(3) or (4), the following actions in addition to those prescribed in (a) of this section shall be taken before the date the prohibition becomes effective:

the board shall notify, by certified mail, all package store licensees who sell alcoholic beverages in response to a written solicitation of the local option; and

the municipality or established village shall post public notice of the prohibition in a central location in the municipality or village.

History.

(§ 28 ch 101 SLA 1995)